Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4292.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 602. The department shall do all of the following: (a) Be responsible to the executive director, who shall be is the principal executive officer of the department and shall be is responsible for executing the policies of the commission. (b) Appoint necessary employees and agents and fix their compensation in accordance with civil service rules. The attorney general shall appear for and represent the department or the commission in a court having jurisdiction of a matter under this act. (c) Receive, initiate, investigate, conciliate, adjust, dispose of, issue charges, and hold hearings on complaints alleging a violation of this act, and approve or disapprove plans to correct past discriminatory practices which have caused or resulted in a denial of equal opportunity with respect to groups or persons protected by this act. If the department conducts an investigation under this subdivision regarding an alleged violation of article 2, the department shall follow procedures that ensure to the greatest extent reasonably possible the anonymity of an individual who has alleged a violation of article 2 or has assisted or participated in the investigation of an alleged violation of article 2. (d) Require answers to interrogatories; , order the submission of books, papers, records, and other materials pertinent to a complaint; , and require the attendance of witnesses; , administer oaths; , take testimony; , and compel, through court authorization, compliance with its orders or an order of the commission. (e) Cooperate or contract with persons and state, local, and other agencies, both public and private, including agencies of the federal government and of other states. (f) Monitor the awarding and execution of contracts to ensure compliance by a contractor or a subcontractor with a covenant entered into or to be entered into pursuant to under section 209. (g) Maintain a telephone line that meets both of the following requirements: (i) Is used for the sole purpose of receiving reports of violations of this act. (ii) Allows for anonymous reporting. (h) Maintain a public website that includes all of the following: (i) Information about rights under this act. (ii) A link to an easy-to-use form for electronic reporting of a violation of this act that allows for anonymous reporting. (iii) The prominent display of the telephone number of the telephone line required under subdivision (g).